Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Subchapter 2. Lard

§ 3291.
Compound lard.

A person by himself, herself, his or her agent, or servant shall not prepare, sell, or expose for sale lard or a substance intended for use as lard, which contains an ingredient other than the pure fat of swine, in a tierce, bucket, pail, or other package, under a label bearing the words “pure,” “refined,” or “family,” alone or in combination with other words, unless the package containing the same bears upon the outside thereof, in letters not less than a fourth of an inch long, the words “compound lard.”

A person who violates the provision of subsection (a) of this section shall be fined not more than $50.00 for each offense.